Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HUBERT H. HUMPHREY STATUE.new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration to replace the statue of Henry Mower Rice in the Statutory Hall in the United States Capitol with a statue of Hubert H. Humphrey. This appropriation includes money for the removal and transportation of the Henry Mower Rice statue to the Minnesota State Historical Society, the recasting of the statue of Hubert H. Humphrey that currently stands on the mall of the Minnesota State Capitol, and the erection of the new Hubert H. Humphrey statue in the Statutory Hall in the United States Capitol. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end